Massachusetts, session 194th, H3001.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 91A of chapter 32 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing
in the 2020 official edition, are hereby amended by adding the following new provisions:-
(1) Any firefighter, any call, volunteer, auxiliary, intermittent or reserve firefighter, any
call, volunteer, auxiliary, intermittent or reserve emergency medical services provider who is a
member of a police or fire department and who is not subject to chapter 152, any police officer,
any auxiliary, intermittent, special, part-time or reserve police officer or any municipal or public
emergency medical technician or licensed health care professional, or any correction officer or
correctional program officer who is unable to perform the essential duties of the member’s job
by reason of accidental disability as defined by section 7 shall be subject to the provisions of
subsection (2).
(2) Notwithstanding the hours and earnings limitations of section 91A, or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the annual earnings of a member identified in subsection
of 2

(1) receiving benefits under this section from employment in the service of the commonwealth or
a county, city, town, district or authority, including as a consultant or independent contractor or
as a person whose regular duties require that their time be devoted to the service of the
commonwealth, county, city, town, district or authority during regular business hours, may equal
up to ½ the amount of their retirement allowance without refund penalty. Such members shall
not be eligible for employment under Groups 3 and 4 of the retirement system while receiving
benefits for accidental disability retirement outlined under this clause. A member who is
receiving benefits under this clause may be employed by a private entity or in the private sector
without refund penalty; provided, however, that their service is not devoted to the
commonwealth or a county, city, town, district or authority. Nothing in this section shall prohibit
a member under this clause, or such member’s eligible spouse or children, from receiving
additional retirement benefits not required by this clause.
of 2